Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202680-415
Veterans Employment Program Fund; created; use; investment.

The Veterans Employment Program Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02 and any other money as appropriated by the Legislature. The fund shall be administered by the Department of Veterans' Affairs, which shall use the fund for recruiting and education to attract veterans recently released from service to live and work in Nebraska, including the development and implementation of a website as required by section 48-203. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2019, LB138, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 64.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.